Utah statutes.
58-76-201.   Board.
(1)  There is created the Professional Geologist Licensing Board consisting of
five members as follows:
(a)  three professional geologists;
(b)  the Utah state geologist; and
(c)  one member representing the general public.
(2)  Except for the Utah state geologist, the board shall be appointed and
serve in accordance with Section 58-1-201.
(3)  The duties and responsibilities of the board are in accordance with
Sections 58-1-202 and 58-1-203, and the board shall also:
(a)  designate one of its members on a permanent or rotating basis to assist
the division in reviewing complaints concerning the unlawful or unprofessional
conduct of professional geologists; and
(b)  advise the division in its investigation of these complaints.
(4)  A board member who has, under Subsection (3), reviewed a complaint or
advised in its investigation may be disqualified from participating with the
board when the board serves as a presiding officer in an adjudicative
proceeding concerning the complaint.
